vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn > Thiết bị hẹn giờ hỗ trợ chăm sóc trẻ: Thiết bị hẹn giờ analog; Thiết bị hẹn giờ kỹ thuật số
nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating > Tidtakere for babypleie: Analoge timere; Digitale timere
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação > Temporizadores para bebés: Temporizadores analógicos; Temporizadores digitais
nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding > Timers voor babyverzorging: Analoge timers; Digitale timers
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés > Babaápolási időzítők: Analóg időzítők; Digitális időzítők
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie > Zegary do pielęgnacji niemowląt: Zegary analogowe; Zegary cyfrowe
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire > Cronometre pentru îngrijirea bebelușilor: Cronometre analogice; Cronometre digitale
sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning > Babytimers: Analoga timers; Digitala timers
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене > Таймери за грижа за бебето: Аналогови таймери; Цифрови таймери
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养 > 婴儿护理定时器: 模拟定时器; 数字定时器
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม > เครื่องจับเวลาสำหรับการดูแลเด็กทารก: เครื่องจับเวลาแบบอนาล็อก; เครื่องจับเวลาแบบดิจิตอล
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione > Timer per cura bebè: Temporizzatori analogici; Temporizzatori digitali
en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding > Baby Care Timers: Analog Timers; Digital Timers
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení > Zařízení pro časování péče o kojence: Analogové časovače; Digitální časovače
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje > Mjerači vremena za njegu bebe: Analogni mjerači vremena; Digitalni mjerači vremena
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση > Χρονόμετρα βρεφικής φροντίδας: Αναλογικά χρονόμετρα; Ψηφιακά χρονόμετρα
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食 > 嬰兒照護計時器: 類比計時器; 數位計時器
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação > Relógios para cuidados do bebê: Temporizadores analógicos; Temporizadores digitais
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning > Babypleje – ur: Analoge timere; Digitale timere
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie > Dojčenské časovače: Analógové časovače; Digitálne časovače
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación > Temporizadores para los cuidados del bebé: Temporizadores analógicos; Temporizadores digitales
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation > Minuteurs pour le soin du bébé: Minuteurs analogiques; Minuteurs numériques
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern > Babypflege-Timer: Analoge Timer; Digitale Timer
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen > Vauvanhoitoajastin: Analogiset ajastimet; Digitaaliset ajastimet
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas > Kūdikių priežiūros laikmačiai: Analoginiai laikmačiai; Skaitmeniniai laikmačiai
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품 > 육아용 타이머: 아날로그 타이머; 디지털 타이머
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食 > ベビーケアタイマー: アナログタイマー; デジタルタイマー
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme > Bebek Bakım Zamanlayıcıları: Analog Zamanlayıcılar; Dijital Zamanlayıcılar
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje > Časovniki za nego dojenčka: Analogni časovniki; Digitalni časovniki
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление > Таймеры для ухода за детьми: Аналоговые таймеры; Цифровые таймеры